North Carolina, session 2025, SB360.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) To Provide at Least One School Nurse in Every School. – Local boards of
education shall ensure that each school within the local school administrative
unit is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(37) To provide at least one school nurse in every school. – The board of trustees
shall ensure that each school is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent
school nurse."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) At Least One School Nurse. – A charter school shall ensure that the school is staffed
by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) At least one school nurse required. – A regional school shall ensure that the
school is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) At least one school nurse required. – A laboratory school shall ensure that the
school is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of ninety-five million dollars
($95,000,000) in recurring funds to increase the School Health Personnel Allotment. These funds
shall be used to increase positions for school nurses in order to provide at least one full-time,
permanent school nurse in every school in a public school unit.
SECTION 3. Funds provided pursuant to this act shall supplement and not supplant
any funds from any source already provided for school nurses.
*S360-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025. Section 1 of this act applies
beginning with the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 360-First Edition